Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-827
Material or work; adjudicated obscene; contraband; proceeds of sale to county; other copies; disposal.

Material or work introduced in evidence and judicially adjudicated to be obscene is contraband and there are no property rights therein. All monetary consideration received for such work, material, conduct or live performance is recoverable as damages to the county where sold or exhibited. The defendant, as part of the court order, shall be required to remove from the state all other identical copies owned or controlled by such defendant within five days after a court determination of obscenity thereof or the same shall be deemed forfeited to the state for destruction by the state.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 183;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 15.